California, session 20252026, SB1078.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 51.1 of the Civil Code is amended to read:51.1. If a violation of Section 51, 51.5, 51.7, 51.9, or 52.1 is alleged or the application or construction of any of these sections is in issue in any proceeding in the Supreme Court of California, a state court of appeal, or the appellate division of a superior court, each party shall serve a copy of the party’s brief or petition and brief, brief on the State Solicitor General at the Office office of the Attorney General. No General and on the Director of the Civil Rights Department. A brief may shall not be accepted for filing unless the proof of service shows service on the State Solicitor General. General and on the Director of the Civil Rights Department. Any party failing to comply with this requirement shall be given a reasonable opportunity to cure the failure before the court imposes any sanction and, in that instance, the court shall allow the Attorney General and the Director of the Civil Rights Department reasonable additional time to file a brief in the matter.SECTION 1.Chapter 3.85 (commencing with Section 7294.7) is added to Part 1.7 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:3.85.County of Santa Cruz Transactions and Use Tax7294.7.(a)Notwithstanding any other law, the County of Santa Cruz may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes to support countywide programs at a rate of no more than 0.5 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1, if all of the following requirements are met:(1)The Santa Cruz County Board of Supervisors adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by any applicable voting approval requirement.(2)The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance by the applicable voting approval requirement in accordance with Article XIII C of the California Constitution.(3)The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.(b)Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax rate imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.(c)If, as of December 31, 2030, an ordinance proposing a transactions and use tax has not been approved in the County of Santa Cruz as authorized by subdivision (a), this chapter shall be repealed.SEC. 2.The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique fiscal pressures being experienced in the County of Santa Cruz in providing essential programs.SEC. 3.This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:To provide an immediate opportunity for the voters of the County of Santa Cruz to consider a local tax measure to offset reductions to social safety net services, it is necessary that this act take effect immediately.